pt-BR: Tipo de pneu do veículo: Para qualquer estação; Qualquer terreno; Terreno lamacento; Desempenho; Run-flat; Verão; Passeio; Inverno; Outro
fi: Ajoneuvon rengastyyppi: Koko kauden; Maasto; Mutainen maasto; Performance; Kulkee tyhjänä; Kesä; Touring; Talvi; Muu
bg-BG: Тип автомобилна гума: За всички сезони; Всички терени; Кален терен; Производителност; Run-flat; Лятна; Туринг; Зимна; Други
de: Fahrzeugreifentyp: Ganzjährig; Geländetauglich; Schlammiges Terrain; Leistung; Runflat; Sommer; Touring; Winter; Sonstiges
ko: 차량 타이어 종류: 사계절; 모든 지형; 진흙 지형; 퍼포먼스; 런플랫; 여름; 투어링; 겨울; 기타
en: Vehicle tire type: All-season; All-terrain; Mud-terrain; Performance; Run-flat; Summer; Touring; Winter; Other
th: ประเภทยางรถยนต์: ทุกฤดูกาล; ทุกพื้นที่; พื้นที่แบบโคลน; สมรรถนะสูง; วิ่งบนทางราบ; ฤดูร้อน; ทัวริ่ง; ฤดูหนาว; อื่นๆ
da: Køretøjsdæktype: Helårs; Alt terræn; Mudder-terræn; Performance; Punktering; Sommer; Touring; Vinter; Andet
zh-TW: 車輛輪胎類型: 不分季節; 全地形; 泥地; 性能; 失壓續跑; 夏季; 旅行; 冬季; 其他
cs: Typ pneumatiky vozidla: Celoroční; Do každého terénu; Bahenní terén; Vysoký výkon; Dojezdové; Letní; Cestovní; Zimní; Jiné
ro-RO: Tipul anvelopelor pentru vehicule: Toate anotimpurile; Toate tipurile de teren; Teren noroios; Performanță; Run-flat; Vară; Touring; Iarnă; Altele
nb: Dekktype for kjøretøy: Hele året; Terreng; Gjørmete terreng; Ytelse; Run-flat; Sommer; Tur; Vinter; Annet
sv: Typ av fordonsdäck: All-väders; Terräng; Lerterräng; Prestanda; Run-flat; Sommar; Touring; Vinter; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta guma za vozilo: Sva godišnja doba; Svi tereni; Blatni teren; Performansa; Run-flat; Ljetne; Obilazak; Zimske; Ostalo
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės padangų tipas: Universalios; Pravažios; Skirtos bekelei; Našumas; „Run-Flat“; Vasarinės; „Touring“; Žieminės; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta pnevmatike vozila: Vse sezone; Vsi tereni; Blatni teren; Učinkovitost; Praznovozne; Poletje; Turing; Zimske; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de pneu do veículo: Para todas as estações; Todo-o-terreno; Terreno lamacento; Desempenho; Run-flat; Verão; Passeio; Inverno; Outro
es: Tipo de neumático del vehículo: Todas las estaciones; Todo terreno; Terreno embarrado; Rendimiento; Antipinchazos; Verano; Turismo; Invierno; Otros
zh-CN: 车辆轮胎类型: 全季节; 全地形; 泥路; 高性能; 漏气续行; 夏季; 旅行胎; 冬季; 其他
vi: Loại lốp xe: Phù hợp với mọi mùa; Bánh xe cho mọi địa hình; Phù hợp với địa hình đất bùn; Hiệu suất; Chống xịt; Lốp cho mùa hè; Lốp đi phượt; Lốp cho mùa đông; Khác
sk-SK: Typ pneumatiky vozidla: Celoročný; Terénny; Blatový terén; Výkon; Dojazdový; Letná; Univerzálny; Zimný; Iné
fr: Type de pneu de véhicule: Toutes saisons; Tout-terrain; Terrain boueux; Performance; Run-flat; Été; Tourisme; Hiver; Autre
it: Tipo di pneumatico del veicolo: Quattro stagioni; Fuoristrada; Terreno fangoso; Prestazioni; Run-flat; Estiva; Da viaggio; Invernali; Altro
pl: Typ opony pojazdu: Całoroczne; Opona do jazdy w każdym terenie; Błotnisty teren; Stopa zwrotu; Run-flat; Lato; Na trasy; Zima; Inne
tr: Araç lastiği tipi: Dört mevsim; Tüm arazi türlerine uygun; Çamurlu arazi; Performans; Run flat; Yaz; Touring; Kış; Diğer
el: Τύπος ελαστικού οχήματος: Όλη τη σεζόν; Παντός εδάφους; Λάσπη-έδαφος; Απόδοση; Run-flat; Καλοκαίρι; Περιήγησης; Χειμωνιάτικες; Άλλο
ja: 車両用タイヤの種類: オールシーズン; 全地形対応; マッドテレーン; パフォーマンス; ランフラット; 夏; ツーリング; 冬; その他
hu: Jármű gumiabroncstípusa: Négyévszakos; Összterepes; Sárterepes; Teljesítmény; Defekttűrő; Nyári; Túrázó; Téli; Egyéb
nl: Type voertuigband: Hele seizoen; All-terrain; Modderterrein; Prestaties; Run-flat; Zomer; Toeren; Winter; Andere
ru: Тип автомобильной шины: Всесезонные; Внедорожные; Грязевые; Производительность; Прокатные; Лето; Туристические; Зима; Другой